Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,162
State and public agencies; powers.

The state and all public agencies of this state are authorized to appropriate, lend credit, and make donations to local housing agencies and to agree to make such appropriations, loans, or donations upon such lawful terms and conditions as they shall from time to time deem appropriate.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 91.